California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 establish or collect tolls or otherwise operate any toll facility or modify or expand a toll facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 194)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

149.8.

(a) Pursuant to Section 149.7, the Legislature hereby authorizes a value pricing and transit program involving high-occupancy toll (HOT) lanes to be developed and operated on State Highway Route 15 in Riverside County by the Riverside County Transportation Commission, as one of two toll lane projects in southern California authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 149.7.

(b) The Riverside County Transportation Commission shall carry out the program in cooperation with the department
 pursuant to a cooperative agreement that addresses all matters related to design, construction, maintenance, and operation of state highway program facilities in connection with the value pricing and transit program. With the assistance of the department, the Riverside County Transportation Commission shall establish appropriate traffic flow guidelines for the purpose of ensuring optimal use of the express lanes by high-occupancy vehicles without adversely affecting other traffic on the state highway system. The commission shall operate the HOT lane facilities in a manner consistent with the minimum level of service standards established in subdivision (b) of Sections 149.4, 149.5, and 149.6.

(c) (1) Pursuant to Section 149.7, the Riverside County Transportation Commission shall have the authority to set, levy, and collect tolls, user fees, or other similar charges payable for the use of the State Highway Route 15 HOT
 lanes, and any other incidental or related fees or charges, in amounts as required for the following expenditures relative to State Highway Route 15 and for purposes of paragraph (2):

(A) Capital outlay, including the costs of design, construction, right-of-way acquisition, and utility adjustment.

(B) Operations and maintenance, including, but not limited to, toll collection and enforcement.

(C) Repair and rehabilitation.

(D) Indebtedness incurred, including related financing costs.

(E) Reserves.

(F) Administration, which shall not exceed 3 percent of toll and associated facility revenues.

(2) Excess toll revenues beyond the expenditure needs of paragraph (1) may be expended for the following purposes:

(A) To enhance transit service designed to reduce traffic congestion on State Highway Route 15 or to expand travel options along the State Highway Route 15 corridor. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, transit operating assistance, the acquisition of transit vehicles, and the transit capital improvements otherwise eligible to be funded under the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 164.

(B) To make operational or capacity improvements designed to reduce congestion or improve the flow of traffic on State Highway Route 15. Eligible expenditures may include any phase of project delivery to make capital improvements to onramps, connector roads, roadways, bridges, or
 other structures that are related to the tolled or nontolled facilities on State Highway Route 15.

(3) The Riverside County Transportation Commission is authorized to issue bonds to finance the costs of the HOT lane facilities on State Highway Route 15, including the costs of issuing the bonds and paying credit enhancement and other fees related to the bonds, which bonds are payable from the tolls authorized in paragraph (1), and any other sources of revenue available to the Riverside County Transportation Commission that may be used for these purposes, including, but not limited to, sales tax revenue, development impact fees, or state and federal grant funds. The bonds may be sold pursuant to the terms and conditions set forth in a resolution adopted by the governing board of the Riverside County Transportation Commission. Bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing board. Any bond issued
 pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a debt or liability of the state and shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect:

“Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of principal or interest of this bond.”

(4) The Riverside County Transportation Commission shall make available for public review and comment the proposed toll schedule, or any changes to the schedule, a minimum of 30 days prior to its adoption by the Riverside County Transportation Commission.

(d) The Riverside County Transportation Commission, in consultation with the department, shall issue a plan of transportation improvements for the State Highway Route 15 corridor, which shall include projected costs, the use of toll revenues, and a proposed completion schedule. This
 plan shall be updated annually. The plan and each annual update shall be made available for public review and comment no less than 30 days prior to its adoption by the Riverside County Transportation Commission.

(e) This section shall not prevent the department or any local agency from constructing facilities within the State Highway Route 15 corridor that compete with the HOT lane transportation project, and in no event shall the Riverside County Transportation Commission be entitled to compensation for the adverse effects on toll revenue due to those facilities.

(f) If any provision of this section or the application thereof is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this extent the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

149.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 149 and 30800 of this code, and Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle Code, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (LACMTA) may conduct, administer, and operate a value-pricing and transit development program involving high-occupancy toll (HOT) lanes on State Highway Routes 10 and 110 in the County of Los Angeles. LACMTA, with the consent of the department, may direct and authorize the entry and use of the State Highway Routes 10 and 110 high-occupancy vehicle lanes by single-occupant vehicles and those vehicles that do not meet minimum occupancy requirements, as defined by LACMTA, for a fee. The amount of the fee shall be established by, and collected in a manner to be determined by, LACMTA. LACMTA
 may continue to require high-occupancy vehicles to have an electronic transponder or other electronic device for enforcement purposes.

(b) LACMTA shall implement the program in cooperation with the department, and with the active participation of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, pursuant to an agreement that addresses all matters related to design, construction, maintenance, and operation of state highway system facilities in connection with the program. With the consent of the department, LACMTA shall establish appropriate performance measures, such as speed or travel times, for the purpose of ensuring optimal use of the HOT lanes by high-occupancy vehicles without adversely affecting other traffic on the state highway system.

(1) Agreements between
 LACMTA, the department, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall identify the respective obligations and liabilities of each party to the agreement and assign them responsibilities relating to the program. The agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall be consistent with agreements between the department and the United States Department of Transportation relating to programs of this nature. The agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall include clear and concise procedures for enforcement by the Department of the California Highway Patrol of laws prohibiting the unauthorized use of the HOT lanes. The agreements shall provide for reimbursement of state agencies, from revenues generated by the program or other funding sources that are not otherwise available to state agencies for transportation-related projects, for costs incurred in connection with the implementation
 or operation of the program, as well as maintenance of state highway system facilities in connection with the program.

(2) All remaining revenue generated by the program shall be used in the corridor from which the revenue was generated exclusively for preconstruction, construction, and other related costs of high-occupancy vehicle facilities, transportation corridor improvements, and the improvement of transit service in the corridor, including, but not limited to, support for transit operations pursuant to an expenditure plan adopted by LACMTA. LACMTA’s administrative expenses related to the operation of the program shall not exceed 3 percent of the revenues.

(c) Single-occupant vehicles and those vehicles that do not meet minimum occupancy requirements that are certified or
 authorized by LACMTA for entry into, and use of, the State Highway Routes 10 and 110 high-occupancy vehicle lanes are exempt from Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle Code, and the driver shall not be in violation of the Vehicle Code because of that entry and use.

(d) (1) In implementing the program, LACMTA shall continue to work with the affected communities in the respective corridors and provide mitigation measures for commuters of low income, including reduced toll charges and toll credits for transit
 users. Eligible commuters for reduced toll charges or toll credits for transit users shall meet the eligibility requirements for assistance programs under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of, Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of, or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900), Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930), or Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6 of, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Beyond the measures already implemented to create a low-income assistance program, LACMTA shall take additional steps to increase enrollment and participation in the low-income assistance program. LACMTA, in that regard, shall improve awareness of the low-income assistance program through advertising and by working with local community groups and social service agencies to distribute information about the low-income assistance program. In addition, LACMTA shall consider offering greater incentives to
 encourage participation in the low-income assistance program.

(e) (1) LACMTA and the department shall report to the Legislature by January 31, 2015. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a summary of the program, a survey of its users, the impact on carpoolers, revenues generated, how transit service or alternative modes of transportation were impacted, any potential effect on traffic congestion in the high-occupancy vehicle lanes and in the neighboring lanes, the number of toll-paying vehicles that utilized the HOT lanes, any potential reductions in the greenhouse gas emissions that are attributable to
 congestion reduction resulting from the HOT lane program, any comments submitted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol regarding operation of the lanes, and a description of the mitigation measures on the affected communities and commuters in the program. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 31, 2019, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) LACMTA and the department shall report to the policy committees of the Legislature with responsibility for transportation matters by December 31, 2018, on the efforts to improve the program authorized by this section. The report shall address efforts by LACMTA to increase participation in the low-income participation program, any
 additional incentives that have been developed to encourage participation in the low-income participation program, and the performance of the HOT lanes overall in improving congestion in the affected corridors and offsetting the impact to low-income commuters. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(f) Toll paying commuters shall have the option to purchase any necessary toll paying equipment, prepay tolls, and renew toll payments by cash or by using a credit card.

(g) This section shall not prevent the department or any local agency from constructing facilities that compete with a HOT lane program, and LACMTA shall not be entitled to compensation for adverse effects on toll revenue due to those facilities.

(h) LACMTA may issue bonds, as set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 130500) of Division 12 of the Public Utilities Code, at any time to finance any costs necessary to implement a value-pricing and transit development program established in accordance with this section and to finance any expenditures payable from the revenues generated from the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

149.10.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 149 and 30800 of this code, and Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle Code, the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) may conduct, administer, and operate a value pricing and transit development program on the State Highway Route 5 in managed lanes serving as a high-occupancy vehicle expressway. The program, under the circumstances described in subdivision (b), may direct and authorize the entry and use of the State Highway Route 5 high-occupancy vehicle lanes by single-occupant vehicles during peak periods, as defined by SANDAG, for a fee. The amount of the fee shall be established from time to time by SANDAG, and collected in a manner determined by SANDAG.

(b) Implementation of the program shall ensure that Level of Service C, as measured by the most recent issue of the Highway Capacity Manual, as adopted by the Transportation Research Board, is maintained at all times in the high-occupancy vehicle lanes, except that subject to a written agreement between the department and SANDAG that is based on operating conditions of the high-occupancy vehicle lanes, Level of Service D shall be permitted on the high-occupancy vehicle lanes. If Level of Service D is permitted, the department and SANDAG shall evaluate the impacts of these levels of service of the high-occupancy vehicle lanes, and indicate any effects on the mixed-flow lanes. Continuance of Level of Service D operating conditions shall be subject to the written agreement between the department and SANDAG. Unrestricted access to the lanes by high-occupancy vehicles shall be available at all times. At least annually, the department shall audit the level of service during peak traffic hours and
 report the results of that audit at meetings of the program management team.

(c) Single-occupant vehicles that are certified or authorized by SANDAG for entry into, and use of, the State Highway Route 5 high-occupancy vehicle lanes are exempt from Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle Code, and the driver shall not be in violation of the Vehicle Code because of that entry and use.

(d) SANDAG shall carry out the program in cooperation with the department and shall consult the department in the operation of the project and on matters related to highway design and construction. With the assistance of the department, SANDAG shall establish appropriate traffic flow guidelines for the purpose of ensuring optimal use of the express lanes by high-occupancy vehicles.

(e) (1) Agreements between SANDAG, the
 department, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall identify the respective obligations and liabilities of those entities and assign them responsibilities relating to the program. The agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall be consistent with agreements between the department and the United States Department of Transportation relating to this program and shall include clear and concise procedures for enforcement by the Department of the California Highway Patrol of laws prohibiting the unauthorized use of the high-occupancy vehicle lanes. The agreements shall provide for reimbursement of state agencies, from revenues generated by the program, federal funds specifically allocated to SANDAG for the program by the federal government, or other funding sources that are not otherwise available to state agencies for transportation-related projects, for costs incurred in connection with the implementation or operation of the program. Reimbursement for SANDAG’s program-related
 planning and administrative costs in the operation of the program shall not exceed 3 percent of the revenues.

(2) All remaining revenue shall be used in the State Highway Route 5 corridor exclusively for (A) the improvement of transit service, including, but not limited to, construction of transit facilities and support for transit operations, and (B) high-occupancy vehicle facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 535, Sec. 3.   (SB 468)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

149.11.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 149 and 30800 of this code, and Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle Code, the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority, created pursuant to Section 130806 of the Public Utilities Code, may conduct, administer, and operate a value-pricing program in the Interstate 10 and Interstate 15 corridors in the County of San Bernardino. The value-pricing program may include high-occupancy toll lanes or other toll facilities. The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority may also extend the program to include the approaching and departing connectors on Interstate 10 extending into the County of Los Angeles, as designated by an agreement with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation
 Authority, and the connection to the Interstate 15 express lanes project in the County of Riverside, as designated by an agreement with the Riverside County Transportation Commission. The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority may exercise its existing powers of eminent domain pursuant to Section 130220.5 of the Public Utilities Code to acquire property necessary to carry out the purposes of the value-pricing program.

(2) The value-pricing program authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) may only be implemented upon a determination that the program and the resulting facilities will improve the performance of the affected corridors. Improved performance may be demonstrated by factors that include, but are not limited to, increased passenger throughput or improved travel times. The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall
 make the determination required by this paragraph in a public meeting prior to operation of the value-pricing program.

(3) The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall have the authority to set, levy, and collect tolls, user fees, or other similar charges payable for the use of the toll facilities in the County of San Bernardino and any other incidental or related fees or charges, and to collect those revenues, in a manner determined by the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority, in amounts as required for the following expenditures relative to the program and for the purposes of paragraph (4):

(A) Development, including the costs of design, construction, right-of-way acquisition, and utilities adjustment.

(B) Operations and maintenance, including, but not limited to, insurance, collection, and enforcement of tolls, fees, and charges.

(C) Repair, rehabilitation, and reconstruction.

(D) Indebtedness incurred and internal loans and advances, including related financial costs.

(E) Administration, which shall not exceed 3 percent of the revenues of toll facilities and associated transportation facilities.

(F) Reserves for the purposes described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive.

(4) All revenue generated pursuant to paragraph (3) in excess of the expenditure needs of that paragraph shall be used
 exclusively for the benefit of the transportation corridors included in the value-pricing program created pursuant to this section. These excess revenue expenditures shall be described in an excess revenue expenditure plan developed in consultation with the department and adopted and periodically updated by the board of directors of the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority and may include, but need not be limited to, the following eligible expenditures:

(A) Expenditures to enhance transit service designed to reduce traffic congestion within the transportation corridors included in the value-pricing program created pursuant to this section. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, transit operating assistance, the acquisition of transit vehicles, and transit capital improvements otherwise eligible to be funded
 under the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 164.

(B) Expenditures to make operational or capacity improvements designed to reduce traffic congestion or improve the flow of traffic in the transportation corridors included in the value-pricing program created pursuant to this section. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, any phase of project delivery to make capital improvements to on ramps, off ramps, connector roads, roadways, bridges, or other structures that are necessary for or related to the tolled or nontolled transportation facilities in the transportation corridors included in the value-pricing program created pursuant to this section.

(5) To the extent the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority plans to extend the
 value-pricing program into the Counties of Los Angeles or Riverside, it shall enter into an agreement with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority or the Riverside County Transportation Commission, as applicable, subject to approval of the board of directors of the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority and the board of directors of the affected entity. If the value-pricing program developed and operated by the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority connects to, or is near, similar toll facilities constructed and operated by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority or the Riverside County Transportation Commission, the respective entities shall enter into an agreement providing for the coordination of the toll facilities operated by each entity.

(b) (1) The
 San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall carry out the program in cooperation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to an agreement that addresses all matters related to enforcement on state highway system facilities in connection with the value-pricing program, and with the department pursuant to an agreement that addresses all matters related to the design, construction, maintenance, and operation of state highway system facilities in connection with the
 value-pricing program, including, but not limited to, financing, repair, rehabilitation, and reconstruction.

(2) The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall be responsible for reimbursing the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol for costs related to the toll facility pursuant to an agreement between the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority and the department and between the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(c) Single-occupant vehicles that are certified or authorized by the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority for entry into, and use of, the high-occupancy toll lanes implemented pursuant to this section are exempt from Section 21655.5 of the Vehicle
 Code, and the driver shall not be in violation of the Vehicle Code because of that entry and use.

(d) (1) The San Bernardino County Transportation Authority may issue bonds at any time to finance any costs necessary to implement the program established pursuant to this section and any expenditures provided for in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a), payable from the revenues generated from the program and any other sources of revenues available to the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority that may be used for these purposes, including, but not limited to, sales tax revenue, development impact fees, or state and federal grants.

(2) The maximum bonded indebtedness that may be outstanding at any one time shall not exceed an amount that may be serviced from
 the projected revenues available as described in paragraph (1).

(3) The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable at intervals determined by the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority.

(4) Any bond issued pursuant to this subdivision shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect:

“Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of principal of, or interest on, this bond.”

(5) Bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution of the governing board of the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority adopted by a majority vote of its
 governing board. The resolution or bond authorizing instrument shall state all of the following:

(A) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(B) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(C) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(D) The maximum term of the bonds and the maximum interest rate.

(E) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(F) The form of the bonds.

(e) Not later
 than three years after either the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission or the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority first collects revenues from the program authorized by this section, the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall submit a report to the Legislative Analyst on its findings, conclusions, and recommendations
 concerning the program. The report shall include an analysis of the effect of the transportation facilities on the adjacent mixed-flow lanes and any comments submitted by the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol regarding operation of the transportation facilities.

(f) This section shall not prevent the department or any local agency from constructing improvements in the transportation corridors that compete with the program, and the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority shall not be entitled to compensation for the adverse effects on toll revenue due to those competing improvements.

(g) If any provision of this section or the application thereof is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications
 of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this extent the provisions
 are severable.

(h) Nothing in this section shall authorize the conversion of any existing nontoll or nonuser-fee lanes into tolled or user-fee lanes, except that a high-occupancy vehicle lane may be converted into a high-occupancy toll lane.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 216, Sec. 9.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

149.12.

The Highway Toll Account is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund for the management of funds received by the department for toll facilities authorized pursuant to Section 149.7 and operated by the department. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Highway Toll Account designated and necessary for the payment of any debt service associated with a toll facility project shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for the purposes described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 149.7. All other moneys deposited in the Highway Toll Account that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to Section 149.7 shall be reserved in the account and shall be available
 for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 149.7. Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid out of the bond proceeds, including premium, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 687, Sec. 3.   (AB 194)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

149.13.

(a) VTA may apply to the commission pursuant to Section 149.7 to conduct, administer, and operate any facility or program described in subdivision (a) of that section to be located on State Highway Route 101 and the portion of State Highway Route 280 north of its junction with State Highway Route 101, or any portion thereof, in the City and County of San Francisco if SFCTA approves the facility or program before VTA submits an application to approve the facility or program to the commission pursuant to Section 149.7.

(b) If the commission approves VTA’s application to conduct, administer, and operate a facility or program located on any portion of state highway described in subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply:

(1) The facility or program approved by the commission shall be subject to all of the provisions of Section 149.7 except to the extent that those provisions are inconsistent with paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive.

(2) VTA shall conduct, administer, and operate the program in coordination with SFCTA.

(3) SFCTA shall develop the expenditure plan described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 149.7 in collaboration with the department and VTA.

(4) The governing board of SFCTA shall review and approve the expenditure plan described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 149.7 and any updates.

(5) The remaining revenue shall be used to benefit the corridor from which it was
 generated pursuant to the expenditure plan.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall apply:

(1) “SFCTA” means the San Francisco County Transportation Authority.

(2) “VTA” means the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority created by the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority Act (Part 12 (commencing with Section 100000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 501, Sec. 2.   (AB 2865)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

149.20.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the director shall adopt a transit policy to guide the implementation of transit priority facilities and transit stops on the state highway system.

(b) The policy described in subdivision (a) shall be developed in consultation with relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, transit operators, local governments, regional transportation planning agencies, and transit advocacy organizations.

(c) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall adopt guidance that does both of the following:

(1) Defines transit performance measures.

(2) Identifies specific responsibilities for the department’s programs, divisions, districts, and offices in supporting the reliable, predictable, and fast movement of transit vehicles on the state highway system.

(d) On or before July 1, 2028, the department shall adopt design guidance for transit priority facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 630, Sec. 5.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

150.

When the department, in cooperation with rapid transit districts, recommends that mass public transportation facilities should be located along a proposed freeway corridor in order to establish a planned balanced transportation system, the commission shall consider this recommendation in making its decision as to the location of the freeway.

If the commission determines that the location of mass public transportation facilities should be located along the proposed freeway corridor, it may also direct the department to plan,
 design, and construct the freeway so as to provide locations for those facilities, and the cost thereof shall be considered as part of the cost of constructing the state highway. In making this determination, the commission shall consider the extent to which the mass public transportation facilities will reduce the volume of traffic on the proposed freeway and the impact the joint development will have on community values. The commission shall also consider whether the rapid transit district has adopted a general plan for the development of its mass public transportation facilities and the likelihood as to whether sufficient funds will be available for the development of mass public transportation service in those locations. The commission shall authorize the department to provide those locations along federal-aid highways only in instances in which it has received assurances of full federal financial participation in the cost of providing those locations.

If mass
 public transportation facilities other than roadways and other facilities for use of buses are to be constructed and placed in use in those locations, the department may enter into agreements for the sale of the locations to transit districts for that use at a price equal to the market value of the property at the time of sale. If mass public transportation facilities are not placed in use in the locations provided within five years of completion of the freeway, the department may develop those locations for freeway purposes, or it may lease or otherwise dispose of the locations in accordance with the provisions of this code.

The department may, in cooperation with rapid transit districts, develop exclusive or preferential bus lanes in those locations in accordance with Section 149.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

151.

The department may make such regulations as may be required in the interests of public safety governing the use of any express highway or additional facilities constructed as provided in this article for the purpose of loading or unloading of passengers.

Nothing in this article or in this section shall be construed to authorize the operation of any vehicle in violation of any provision of the Vehicle Code or to deprive the Public Utilities Commission of any authority now or hereafter vested in it to regulate public motor carriers of passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

152.

The department may permit the placing of, and cooperate in the planning for, emergency water hydrants on or adjacent to state freeway rights-of-way wherever a public water system is available. The placing and maintenance of the hydrants shall be the responsibility of local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 841.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

The department may place and maintain or cooperate with local agencies or others in the placing and maintenance of emergency telephones or other communication facilities on or adjacent to state freeway rights-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 841.)
-------------------------------------------

154.

The department shall encourage the construction and development by counties of portions of the county highways as official county scenic highways and may furnish to the counties any information or other assistance which will aid the counties in the construction or development of such scenic highways.

Whenever the department determines that any county highway meets the minimum standards prescribed by the department for official scenic highways, including the concept of the “complete highway,” as described in Section 261, it
 may authorize the county in which the highway is located to designate the highway as an official county scenic highway and the department shall so indicate the highway in publications of the department and in any maps which are prepared by the department for distribution to the public which show the highway.

If the department determines that any county highway which has been designated as an official county scenic highway no longer meets the minimum standards prescribed by the department for official scenic highways, it may, after notice to the county and a hearing on the matter, if requested by the county, revoke the authority of the county to designate the highway as an official county scenic highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

154.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 154 or any other provision of law and subject to subdivision (b), if the department determines that the County of Los Angeles is in compliance with the standards developed and established pursuant to Section 261 as to the Malibu Canyon-Las Virgenes Highway (N1), from Route 1 to Lost Hills Road in Los Angeles County, the department shall designate that portion of that county highway a county scenic highway.

(b) A designation pursuant to subdivision (a)
 may only be made by the department if the County of Los Angeles applies for the designation, and includes in its application a formally adopted resolution acknowledging its desire to designate that portion of the county highway a county scenic highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

155.

The department may accept any gift of money or property from any person or group for the purpose of acquiring property for, and establishing and maintaining as a memorial to any person or group, a place adjacent to any state highway in the state scenic highway system established by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 260) of Chapter 2, Division 1, at a point of special scenic, historical, or cultural interest, where motorists may stop to appreciate and enjoy the point of interest.

Any money which is received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Special Interest Stopping Place Fund, which fund is hereby
 created in the State Treasury. Any money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years to carry out the purposes for which the money was received by the department.

The department shall, unless otherwise requested by the person or group from whom money or property is received for a stopping place, establish and maintain appropriate signs at the stopping places which indicate the name of the person or group in whose honor the place was established.

The right of eminent domain shall not be exercised by the department to acquire property, or any interest in property, pursuant to this section and the department may not acquire any real property for the purposes of this section unless the board of supervisors of the county in which such real property is located consents to such acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1235.)
-------------------------------------------

155.5.
